Utah statutes.
63M-1-304.   Governor's Office of Economic Development -- Powers and duties of office -- Consulting with board on funds or services provided by office.

(1)  For the purposes of this section:

(a)  "National recruitment" means the recruitment to the state of business, industry, or commerce if, at the time of the recruitment, the business, industry, or commerce is principally located in the United States.

(b)  "Private entity" means a private person, corporation, company, or organization.

(2) (a)  The office shall obtain the advice of the board prior to an imposition of or change to a policy, priority, or objective under which the office operates.

(b)  Subsection (2)(a) does not apply to the routine administration by the office of funds or services related to assistance, retention, or recruitment of business, industry, or commerce in this state.

(3)  The office shall:

(a)  be the industrial promotion authority of the state;

(b)  promote and encourage the economic, commercial, financial, industrial, agricultural, and civic welfare of the state;

(c)  do all lawful acts to create, develop, attract, and retain business, industry, and commerce within the state; and

(d)  do other acts that enhance the economy of the state.

(4)  The office may:

(a)  enter into contracts or agreements with, or make grants to, public or private entities, including municipalities, in the furtherance of its duties where the contracts or agreements are not in violation of the Constitution or statutes of the state; and

(b)  receive and expend funds available from any source, public or private, in any manner and for any lawful purpose in the best interest of the state in the discharge of their obligations under this part.

(5)  The director or the director's designee shall consult with the board at each meeting of the board regarding the administration by the office of funds or services related to assistance, retention, or recruitment of business, industry, or commerce in the state.

